Utah statutes.
58-79-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501, using the title "hunting guide" or "outfitter" or any other title or designation to indicate that the individual is a hunting guide or outfitter or acting as a hunting guide or outfitter, unless the individual has a current license as a hunting guide or outfitter under this chapter.

